Washington statutes.
RCW 8.24.030

Procedure for condemnation—Fees and costs.

The procedure for the condemnation of land for a private way of necessity or for drains, flumes or ditches under the provisions of this chapter shall be the same as that provided for the condemnation of private property by railroad companies, but no private property shall be taken or damaged until the compensation to be made therefor shall have been ascertained and paid as provided in the case of condemnation by railroad companies.

In any action brought under the provisions of this chapter for the condemnation of land for a private way of necessity, reasonable attorneys' fees and expert witness costs may be allowed by the court to reimburse the condemnee.

[ 1988 c 129 s 3; 1913 c 133 s 2; RRS s 936-2. Prior: 1895 c 92 s 2.]

NOTES:

Condemnation by corporations: Chapter 8.20 RCW.

Railroads—Corporate powers and duties: RCW 81.36.010.

Special railroad eminent domain proceedings:

appropriation of railway right-of-way through canyon, pass or defile: RCW 8.20.140.

extensions, branch lines: RCW 81.36.060.

railroad crossings: RCW 81.53.180.

state university—Rights-of-way to railroads: RCW 28B.20.330.